Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
ARTICLE 9
EFFECTIVE DATE

Editor's note:

This title was repealed and reenacted in 1971. This article was numbered as article 9 of chapter 73, C.R.S. 1963. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment of this title in 1971, see the editor's note immediately following the title heading for this title.

Section

5-9-101. Time of taking effect prior to June 30, 2000 - provisions for transition.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this code as it existed prior to the enactment of House Bill 00-1185, as enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-second general assembly, took effect at 12:01 a.m. on October 1, 1971, and was in effect through June 30, 2000.

To the extent appropriate to permit the administrator to prepare for operation of this code as it existed prior to the enactment of House Bill 00-1185, as enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-second general assembly, when it took effect and to act on applications for licenses to make supervised loans under this code as it existed prior to the enactment of House Bill 00-1185, as enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-second general assembly, (subsection (1) of section 5-3-503), the provisions on supervised loans (part 5) of the article on loans (article 3 of this title) and of the article on administration (article 6 of this title) took effect on July 1, 1971, and were in effect through June 30, 2000.

Transactions entered into before October 1, 1971, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them thereafter, may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by any statute, rule of law, or other law amended, repealed, or modified by this code as though the repeal, amendment, or modification had not occurred, but this code, as it existed prior to the enactment of House Bill 00-1185, as enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-second general assembly, applies to:

Refinancings, consolidations, and deferrals made on or after October 1, 1971, and before July 1, 2000, concerning sales, leases, and loans whenever made;

Sales or loans made on or after October 1, 1971, and before July 1, 2000, pursuant to revolving charge accounts (section 5-2-108) and revolving loan accounts (section 5-3-108) entered into, arranged, or contracted for before October 1, 1971; and

All credit transactions made before October 1, 1971, insofar as the article on remedies and penalties (article 5 of this title) limits the remedies of creditors.

With respect to revolving charge accounts (section 5-2-108) and revolving loan accounts (section 5-3-108) entered into, arranged, or contracted for before October 1, 1971, disclosure pursuant to the provisions on disclosure (section 5-2-310 and section 5-3-309), shall be made not later than thirty days after October 1, 1971.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 851, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 73-9-101.

L. 2000:

(1), (2), (3)(a), and (3)(b) amended, p. 1255, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions referenced in this section reflect the provisions as they existed prior to the repeal and reenactment of articles 2 and 3 of this title in 2000. For the referenced provisions, see the 1999 Colorado Revised Statutes.

5-9-101.5. Time of taking effect - provisions for transition.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this code as it exists following the repeal and reenactment contained in House Bill 00-1185, as enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-second general assembly, takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on July 1, 2000.

Transactions entered into before July 1, 2000, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them thereafter, may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by any statute, rule of law, or other law amended, repealed, or modified by this code as though the repeal, amendment, or modification had not occurred, but this code applies to:

Refinancings, consolidations, and deferrals made on or after July 1, 2000, concerning sales, leases, and loans whenever made;

Sales or loans made on or after July 1, 2000, pursuant to revolving credit accounts entered into, arranged, or contracted for before July 1, 2000; and

All credit transactions made before July 1, 2000, insofar as article 5 of this title limits the remedies of creditors. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, the disclosures described in sections 5-3-105 (5), 5-3-106, 5-5-110 (4), and 5-5-111 (3) of this code take effect January 1, 2001.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1256, § 4, effective July 1.

5-9-102. Continuation of licensing prior to July 1, 2000.

Notwithstanding the repeal and reenactment of articles 2 and 3 of chapter 73, C.R.S. 1963, by this code, all persons licensed or otherwise authorized under the provisions of articles 2 or 3 of chapter 73, C.R.S. 1963, immediately prior to October 1, 1971, are licensed to make supervised loans under this code as it existed prior to the enactment of House Bill 00-1185, as enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-second general assembly, pursuant to the provisions on supervised loans of the article on loans (part 5 of article 3 of this title) in effect on and after October 1, 1971, but before July 1, 2000, and all provisions of said sections apply to the persons so previously licensed or authorized. The administrator may, but is not required to, deliver evidence of licensing to the persons so previously licensed or authorized.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 851, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 73-9-102.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1256, § 3, effective July 1.

5-9-102.5. Continuation of licensing after July 1, 2000.

Notwithstanding the repeal and reenactment of part 5 of article 3 of this title by House Bill 00-1185, as enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-second general assembly, all persons licensed or otherwise authorized under the provisions of part 5 of article 3 immediately prior to July 1, 2000, are licensed to make supervised loans under this code pursuant to the provisions on supervised loans contained in part 3 of article 2 of this title, and all provisions of said part 3 apply to the persons so previously licensed or authorized. The administrator may, but is not required to, deliver evidence of licensing to the persons so previously licensed or authorized.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1256, § 4, effective July 1.

5-9-103. (Reserved)